Illinois, session 104th, HB5627.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $19,550,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Office of the Governor for operational expenses of 8the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 9    Section 10. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the Governor's Grant 11Fund to the Office of the Governor to be expended in accordance 12with the terms and conditions upon which such funds were 13received and in the exercise of the powers or performance of 14the duties of the Office of the Governor. 15    Section 15. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Governor 17from the Governor's Administrative Fund for the discharge of 18duties of the office. 19    Section 20. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof as may 20be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to   HB5627- 2 -OMB104 00164 PRA 10164 b1the Office of the Governor for operational expenses associated 2with of the Office of New Americans. 3    Section 25. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Governor 5from the Governor's Administrative Fund for operational 6expenses associated with the office's Director of Housing 7Solutions. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92026.